Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 63.2-1220.1.
Establishment of minimum training requirements.

The Department shall, pursuant to Board regulations, establish minimum training requirements and shall provide educational programs for foster and adoption workers employed by the local department and their supervisors.

History.

2008, cc. 133, 700.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, cc. 133 and 700, cl. 2 provides: “That any costs associated with complying with the provisions of this act shall be absorbed by the Department of Social Services within the funds appropriated to it by the General Assembly for training and assistance to local staff.”